Utah statutes.
31A-22-310.   Assigned risk plan.

(1)  After consultation with insurers authorized to issue policies containing the provisions specified under Section 31A-22-302, the insurance commissioner shall approve a reasonable plan for the equitable apportionment among the insurers of applicants for those policies who are in good faith entitled to, but are unable to procure, these policies through ordinary methods.

(2)  Upon the commissioner's approval of a plan under this section, all insurers issuing policies described under Section 31A-22-302 shall subscribe to and participate in the commissioner's approved plan.

(3)  Any applicant for a policy under the commissioner's plan, any person insured under the plan, and any insurer affected by the commissioner's plan may appeal to the insurance commissioner from any ruling or decision of the manager or committee designated to operate the plan.

(4)  Section 31A-2-306 applies to the commissioner's decision on this appeal.

